Nebraska, session 109, LB637.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB637 LB637
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 9 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Destination Nebraska Act.
Sec. 2. (1) The purpose of the Destination Nebraska Act is to
promote and develop the general and economic welfare of this state and
its communities by providing support for unique Nebraska sports and
retail mixed-use projects that will be destinations for out-of-state
visitors, attract new sports-related industries, create employment
opportunities, and further grow and strengthen Nebraska's retail,
entertainment, and tourism industries.
(2) The Legislature finds that it will be beneficial to the economic
well-being of the people of this state to encourage destination
development projects within the state that create jobs, infrastructure,
and other improvements and attract and retain tourists and college
graduates from around the state.
(3) The Legislature further finds that such projects will (a)
generate new economic activity, as well as additional state and local
taxes from persons residing within and outside the state, (b) create new
economic opportunities and jobs for residents, (c) promote new-to-market
retail, entertainment, and food and beverage attractions, and (d) attract
professional, Olympic, and youth sports teams to build and operate
stadium and arena venues in Nebraska.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Destination Nebraska Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Economic Development;
(2) Destination district means a district created pursuant to
section 5 of this act;
(3) Destination district applicant means the person who applies to
create a destination district pursuant to section 4 of this act; and
(4) Eligible costs means payment and reimbursement of (a) the costs
of acquisition, planning, engineering, designing, financing,
construction, improvement, rehabilitation, renewal, replacement, repair,
landscaping, irrigation, and maintenance of privately and publicly owned
-2-

LB637 LB637
2025 2025
real estate, buildings, improvements, fixtures, equipment, and other
physical assets within a destination district and debt service on such
real estate, buildings, improvements, fixtures, equipment, and other
physical assets, (b) the costs of construction and acquisition of
publicly owned infrastructure and publicly owned property rights within
or related to a destination district, (c) the costs of development,
acquisition, maintenance, and enhancement of technology assets to include
hardware, software, and related intellectual property, if the initial
exclusive use of such property is in or related to a destination
district, and (d) the costs of marketing, tenant improvement allowances,
and tenant and customer acquisition and retention.
Sec. 4. (1) Until December 31, 2025, any person may apply to the
department to create a destination district. All applications shall be in
writing and shall contain:
(a) A description of the proposed project to be undertaken within
the destination district, including a description of any existing
development, an estimate of the total new development costs for the
project, and an estimate of the number of new jobs to be created as a
result of the project;
(b) A map identifying the destination district to be used for
purposes of the project;
(c) A description of the proposed financing of the project; and
(d) Sufficient documents, plans, and specifications as required by
the department to define the project, including the following:
(i) A statement of how the jobs and taxes obtained from the project
will contribute significantly to the economic development of the state
and region;
(ii) Visitation expectations and a plan describing how the number of
visitors to the destination district will be tracked and reported on an
annual basis;
(iii) Any unique qualities of the project;
-3-

LB637 LB637
2025 2025
(iv) An economic impact study, including the anticipated effect of
the project on the regional and statewide economies; and
(v) The expected return on state and local investment the project is
anticipated to produce.
(2) Upon receiving an application, the department shall review the
application and notify the applicant of any additional information needed
for a proper evaluation of the application.
(3) The application and all supporting information shall be
confidential except for the location of the project, the total new
development costs estimated for the project, and the number of new jobs
estimated to be created as a result of the project.
(4) No more than two destination districts may be created statewide.
Sec. 5. (1) If the department finds that creation of the
destination district would not exceed the limit prescribed in subsection
(4) of section 4 of this act and the project described in the application
meets the eligibility requirements of this section, the application shall
be approved.
(2) A project is eligible if the destination district applicant
demonstrates that:
(a) The total new development costs of the project will exceed three
billion dollars; and
(b) The project will attract new-to-market destinations and retail
that will generate a minimum of ten million visitors per year.
(3) Approval of an application under this section shall establish
the destination district as that area depicted in the map accompanying
the application as submitted pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of section 4
of this act. Such district shall last for forty years and shall not
exceed five thousand acres in size. No portion of a destination district
shall be considered to be part of the corporate limits of a city or
village, no city or village may exercise any power whatsoever or collect
any tax in a destination district, and no city or village shall exercise
-4-

LB637 LB637
2025 2025
its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction over the area in a destination
district.
(4) After establishment of the destination district pursuant to this
section, a destination district applicant may adjust the boundaries of
the district by filing an amended map with the department and updates or
supplements to the application materials originally submitted by the
applicant. The department may approve the new boundaries if the
eligibility criteria in subsection (2) of this section will be met after
the boundaries are adjusted.
(5) In addition to the state sales and use tax imposed under section
77-2703, there is also hereby imposed a state occupation tax on
transactions subject to section 77-2703 that occur within a destination
district on property owned by the destination district applicant. The
department shall determine the rate of the occupation tax after notice
and a public hearing upon application to the department by the
destination district applicant. The department shall set the rate at an
amount sufficient to further the purposes of the Destination Nebraska
Act. Such tax shall be collected in the same manner as the sales and use
tax imposed under section 77-2703.
(6) The destination district applicant for an approved destination
district shall have the power to issue bonds in furtherance of the
purposes of the Destination Nebraska Act. Such bonds shall not be
considered an obligation of the state.
(7) In cases where real property within a destination district has
been specially benefited by improvements constructed or installed in the
district, the owner of such real property shall pay the destination
district applicant a sum equivalent to the amount by which the real
property has been specially benefited. If the parties do not agree as to
the amount of the special benefit conferred, the amount of the special
benefit conferred may be determined by the district court in an action
brought by the destination district applicant for such purpose.
-5-

LB637 LB637
2025 2025
Sec. 6. (1) For any destination district, and notwithstanding any
other provision of law to the contrary, the department may (a) designate
a trustee financial institution to hold in trust the occupation tax
proceeds collected pursuant to section 5 of this act and (b) use such
funds in agreements with the destination district applicant to further
the purposes of and take all actions allowed under the Destination
Nebraska Act.
(2) The destination district applicant may use funds received under
this section for any eligible cost.
Sec. 7. The Department of Transportation may enter into agreements
with the destination district applicant of an approved destination
district to provide for the construction of roads and bridges and other
infrastructure within the destination district. Such roads, bridges, and
other infrastructure shall comply with all applicable federal and state
laws and codes.
Sec. 8. The destination district applicant of an approved
destination district may contract for electric service, water and sewer
service, and gas service and may contract with a city or rural or
suburban fire protection district for fire service and emergency medical
service.
Sec. 9. A destination district shall be considered a village for
all purposes of the Community Development Law, and the department may
form a community redevelopment authority to exercise the powers contained
within the Community Development Law. Such community redevelopment
authority shall have and may exercise all powers and duties, and shall
have all obligations, of a community redevelopment authority created
pursuant to the Community Development Law, including, but not limited to,
those described in sections 18-2107 and 18-2147. The department shall
appoint, and may remove, the members of the community redevelopment
authority. At least one member of the community redevelopment authority
shall be a member of the county board of the county in which the
-6-

LB637 LB637
2025 2025
destination district is located. Such community redevelopment authority
shall be known as the Community Redevelopment Authority of the (name of
destination district).
Sec. 10. Section 18-2103, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
18-2103 For purposes of the Community Development Law, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Area of operation means and includes the area within the
corporate limits of the city and such land outside the city as may come
within the purview of sections 18-2123 and 18-2123.01;
(2) Authority means any community redevelopment authority created
pursuant to section 18-2102.01 and any community development agency
created pursuant to section 18-2101.01 and does not include a limited
community redevelopment authority;
(3) Blighted area means an area (a) which, by reason of the presence
of a substantial number of deteriorated or deteriorating structures,
existence of defective or inadequate street layout, faulty lot layout in
relation to size, adequacy, accessibility, or usefulness, insanitary or
unsafe conditions, deterioration of site or other improvements, diversity
of ownership, tax or special assessment delinquency exceeding the fair
value of the land, defective or unusual conditions of title, improper
subdivision or obsolete platting, or the existence of conditions which
endanger life or property by fire and other causes, or any combination of
such factors, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of the
community, retards the provision of housing accommodations, or
constitutes an economic or social liability and is detrimental to the
public health, safety, morals, or welfare in its present condition and
use and (b) in which there is at least one of the following conditions:
(i) Unemployment in the designated area is at least one hundred twenty
percent of the state or national average; (ii) the average age of the
residential or commercial units in the area is at least forty years;
-7-

LB637 LB637
2025 2025
(iii) more than half of the plotted and subdivided property in an area is
unimproved land that has been within the city for forty years and has
remained unimproved during that time; (iv) the per capita income of the
area is lower than the average per capita income of the city or village
in which the area is designated; or (v) the area has had either stable or
decreasing population based on the last two decennial censuses. In no
event shall a city of the metropolitan, primary, or first class designate
more than thirty-five percent of the city as blighted, a city of the
second class shall not designate an area larger than fifty percent of the
city as blighted, and a village shall not designate an area larger than
one hundred percent of the village as blighted. A redevelopment project
involving a formerly used defense site as authorized under section
18-2123.01, any area which is located within a good life district
established under the Good Life Transformational Projects Act, and any
area declared to be an extremely blighted area under section 18-2101.02
shall not count towards the percentage limitations contained in this
subdivision;
(4) Bonds means any bonds, including refunding bonds, notes, interim
certificates, debentures, or other obligations issued pursuant to the
Community Development Law except for bonds issued pursuant to section
18-2142.04;
(5) Business means any private business located in an enhanced
employment area;
(6) City means any city or incorporated village in the state;
(7) Clerk means the clerk of the city or village;
(8) Community redevelopment area means a substandard and blighted
area which the community redevelopment authority designates as
appropriate for a redevelopment project;
(9) Employee means a person employed at a business as a result of a
redevelopment project;
(10) Employer-provided health benefit means any item paid for by the
-8-

LB637 LB637
2025 2025
employer in total or in part that aids in the cost of health care
services, including, but not limited to, health insurance, health savings
accounts, and employer reimbursement of health care costs;
(11) Enhanced employment area means an area not exceeding six
hundred acres (a) within a community redevelopment area which is
designated by an authority as eligible for the imposition of an
occupation tax or (b) not within a community redevelopment area as may be
designated under section 18-2142.04;
(12) Equivalent employees means the number of employees computed by
(a) dividing the total hours to be paid in a year by (b) the product of
forty times the number of weeks in a year;
(13) Extremely blighted area means a substandard and blighted area:
(a) In in which: (i) (a) The average rate of unemployment in the
area during the period covered by the most recent federal decennial
census or American Community Survey 5-Year Estimate is at least two
hundred percent of the average rate of unemployment in the state during
the same period; and (ii) (b) the average poverty rate in the area
exceeds twenty percent for the total federal census tract or tracts or
federal census block group or block groups in the area; or
(b) Which is located in a destination district established pursuant
to the Destination Nebraska Act;
(14) Federal government means the United States of America, or any
agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States
of America;
(15) Governing body or local governing body means the city council,
board of trustees, or other legislative body charged with governing the
municipality;
(16) Limited community redevelopment authority means a community
redevelopment authority created pursuant to section 18-2102.01 having
only one single specific limited pilot project authorized;
(17) Mayor means the mayor of the city or chairperson of the board
-9-

LB637 LB637
2025 2025
of trustees of the village;
(18) New investment means the value of improvements to real estate
made in an enhanced employment area by a developer or a business;
(19) Number of new employees means the number of equivalent
employees that are employed at a business as a result of the
redevelopment project during a year that are in excess of the number of
equivalent employees during the year immediately prior to the year that a
redevelopment plan is adopted;
(20) Obligee means any bondholder, agent, or trustee for any
bondholder, or lessor demising to any authority, established pursuant to
section 18-2102.01, property used in connection with a redevelopment
project, or any assignee or assignees of such lessor's interest or any
part thereof, and the federal government when it is a party to any
contract with such authority;
(21) Occupation tax means a tax imposed under section 18-2142.02;
(22) Person means any individual, firm, partnership, limited
liability company, corporation, company, association, joint-stock
association, or body politic and includes any trustee, receiver,
assignee, or other similar representative thereof;
(23) Public body means the state or any municipality, county,
township, board, commission, authority, district, or other political
subdivision or public body of the state;
(24) Real property means all lands, including improvements and
fixtures thereon, and property of any nature appurtenant thereto, or used
in connection therewith, and every estate, interest and right, legal or
equitable, therein, including terms for years and liens by way of
judgment, mortgage, or otherwise, and the indebtedness secured by such
liens;
(25) Redeveloper means any person, partnership, or public or private
corporation or agency which enters or proposes to enter into a
redevelopment contract;
-10-

LB637 LB637
2025 2025
(26) Redevelopment contract means a contract entered into between an
authority and a redeveloper for the redevelopment of an area in
conformity with a redevelopment plan;
(27) Redevelopment plan means a plan, as it exists from time to time
for one or more community redevelopment areas, or for a redevelopment
project, which (a) conforms to the general plan for the municipality as a
whole and (b) is sufficiently complete to indicate such land acquisition,
demolition and removal of structures, redevelopment, improvements, and
rehabilitation as may be proposed to be carried out in the community
redevelopment area, zoning and planning changes, if any, land uses,
maximum densities, and building requirements;
(28) Redevelopment project means any work or undertaking in one or
more community redevelopment areas: (a) To acquire substandard and
blighted areas or portions thereof, including lands, structures, or
improvements the acquisition of which is necessary or incidental to the
proper clearance, development, or redevelopment of such substandard and
blighted areas; (b) to clear any such areas by demolition or removal of
existing buildings, structures, streets, utilities, or other improvements
thereon and to install, construct, or reconstruct streets, utilities,
parks, playgrounds, public spaces, public parking facilities, sidewalks
or moving sidewalks, convention and civic centers, bus stop shelters,
lighting, benches or other similar furniture, trash receptacles,
shelters, skywalks and pedestrian and vehicular overpasses and
underpasses, enhancements to structures in the redevelopment plan area
which exceed minimum building and design standards in the community and
prevent the recurrence of substandard and blighted conditions, and any
other necessary public improvements essential to the preparation of sites
for uses in accordance with a redevelopment plan; (c) to sell, lease, or
otherwise make available land in such areas for residential,
recreational, commercial, industrial, or other uses, including parking or
other facilities functionally related or subordinate to such uses, or for
-11-

LB637 LB637
2025 2025
public use or to retain such land for public use, in accordance with a
redevelopment plan; and may also include the preparation of the
redevelopment plan, the planning, survey, and other work incident to a
redevelopment project and the preparation of all plans and arrangements
for carrying out a redevelopment project; (d) to dispose of all real and
personal property or any interest in such property, or assets, cash, or
other funds held or used in connection with residential, recreational,
commercial, industrial, or other uses, including parking or other
facilities functionally related or subordinate to such uses, or any
public use specified in a redevelopment plan or project, except that such
disposition shall be at its fair value for uses in accordance with the
redevelopment plan; (e) to acquire real property in a community
redevelopment area which, under the redevelopment plan, is to be repaired
or rehabilitated for dwelling use or related facilities, repair or
rehabilitate the structures, and resell the property; (f) to carry out
plans for a program of voluntary or compulsory repair, rehabilitation, or
demolition of buildings in accordance with the redevelopment plan; and
(g) in a rural community or in an extremely blighted area within a
municipality that is not a rural community, to carry out construction of
workforce housing;
(29) Redevelopment project valuation means the valuation for
assessment of the taxable real property in a redevelopment project last
certified for the year prior to the effective date of the provision
authorized in section 18-2147;
(30) Rural community means any municipality in a county with a
population of fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined
by the most recent federal decennial census;
(31) Substandard area means an area in which there is a predominance
of buildings or improvements, whether nonresidential or residential in
character, which, by reason of dilapidation, deterioration, age or
obsolescence, inadequate provision for ventilation, light, air,
-12-

LB637 LB637
2025 2025
sanitation, or open spaces, high density of population and overcrowding,
or the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire
and other causes, or any combination of such factors, is conducive to ill
health, transmission of disease, infant mortality, juvenile delinquency,
and crime, (which cannot be remedied through construction of prisons),
and is detrimental to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare; and
(32) Workforce housing means:
(a) Housing that meets the needs of today's working families;
(b) Housing that is attractive to new residents considering
relocation to a rural community;
(c) Owner-occupied housing units that cost not more than two hundred
seventy-five thousand dollars to construct or rental housing units that
cost not more than two hundred thousand dollars per unit to construct.
For purposes of this subdivision (c), housing unit costs shall be updated
annually by the Department of Economic Development based upon the most
recent increase or decrease in the Producer Price Index for all
commodities, published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau
of Labor Statistics;
(d) Owner-occupied and rental housing units for which the cost to
substantially rehabilitate exceeds fifty percent of a unit's assessed
value; and
(e) Upper-story housing.
Sec. 11. Original section 18-2103, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-13-